Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 135.010 is amended to read:
135.010. When the accusatory instrument has been  filed, and if the defendant has been arrested,
or as soon thereafter  as the defendant may be arrested, the defendant shall be arraigned thereon
as provided in ORS 135.030 before the court in which it is found. Except for good cause  shown or
at the request of the defendant, if the defendant is in custody, the  arraignment shall be held during
the first 36 hours of custody, excluding  holidays, Saturdays and Sundays. In all other cases, except
as provided for in ORS 133.060, the arraignment shall be held within  96 hours after the arrest , ex-
cluding holidays, Saturdays,  Sundays and any other time period within the normal business
hours of the court during which the court is closed .
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 135.010 by section 1 of this 2026 Act  apply to
arraignments on accusatory instruments filed on or after  the effective date of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4072 (HB 4072-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House February 17, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4072 (HB 4072-INTRO) Page 2